Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.63.073

Comprehensive plan—Amendments and modifications.

All amendments, modifications, or alterations in the comprehensive plan or any part thereof shall be processed in the same manner as set forth in RCW 35A.63.070 through 35A.63.072.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.63.073.]